Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202014-2126
Utilities district; hydrants; location; maintenance.

The metropolitan utilities districts shall maintain free of charge the
number of hydrants heretofore established for fire protection in the streets
of the municipalities constituting such districts and, in addition thereto,
maintain regular fire hydrants on service mains in the streets of the
municipalities not now equipped therewith and also upon service mains that
may hereafter be installed in such municipalities. The board of directors may adopt such rules for the placement
and maintenance of such hydrants as long as such rules do not violate any
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Department of Health
and Human Services. Intermediate hydrants or fire hydrants placed
between regular hydrants shall be installed by the district at such points
as may be designated and ordered by any one of the municipalities. One-half
of the cost of such intermediate hydrants, connections, and installation shall
be borne by the municipality ordering the same. The district shall also lower
water mains and reset hydrants at their original locations whenever necessary.

Laws 1913, c. 143, § 15, p. 357;

R.S.1913, § 4257;

Laws 1919, c. 33, § 4, p. 109;

C.S.1922, § 3760;

C.S.1929, § 14-1016;

Laws 1943, c. 42, § 1, p. 186;

R.S.1943, § 14-1023;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1023;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 26;

Laws 2013, LB208, § 3.

Cited but not discussed. R-R Realty Co. v. Metropolitan Utilities Dist., 184 Neb. 237, 166 N.W.2d 746 (1969).

Promise of water company, assumed by city purchasing waterworks, is matured by above statute, though conditions not fulfilled. Creighton Real Estate Co. v. City of Omaha, 112 Neb. 802, 204 N.W. 66 (1925).

Part of section requiring cities to pay the cost of lowering of gas and water mains is unconstitutional. Metropolitan Utilities District v. City of Omaha, 112 Neb. 93, 198 N.W. 858 (1924).